Rhode Island, session 2025, SB916.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-28.2 of the General Laws entitled "Office of State Fire Marshal"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-28.2-31. Electric and hybrid motor vehicles identification stickers.
(a) The office of state fire marshal ("the office") shall create a sticker to be affixed
voluntarily by a registrant of an electric or hybrid motor vehicle powered in whole or in part by a
high-voltage lithium-ion storage battery to any enclosure housing such a vehicle.
(b) The office shall make the stickers available to registrants of electric or hybrid motor
vehicles upon request, whether in person or through an online application process.
(c) The office is authorized to establish an online application for registrants to request the
sticker identified in subsection (a) of this section.
(d) The office is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to assist fire departments
and fire districts that provide fire protection services in carrying out the objectives of this electrical
fire safety program.
SECTION 2. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-130. Registration of electric and hybrid motor vehicles.
(a) On or after January 1, 2026, any person who registers or renews a registration for an
electric or hybrid motor vehicle powered in whole or in part by a high-voltage lithium-ion storage
battery with the division of motor vehicles may elect to participate in a voluntary fire safety

program by obtaining a sticker from the office of state fire marshal to affix to any enclosure housing
a hybrid or electric motor vehicle.
(b) The division of motor vehicles shall provide any person who registers or renews a
registration for an electric or hybrid motor vehicle with written notice of the office of state fire
marshal's electrical fire safety program and the opportunity to obtain a sticker to affix to any
enclosure housing a hybrid or electric motor vehicle.
(c) The division of motor vehicles shall maintain a list of hybrid and electric motor vehicles
registered in the state and provide quarterly updates of registrations and vehicle descriptions to
include year, make and model to the fire departments and fire districts within the state that provide
fire protection services to be used for official purposes only. There shall be no registrant's names
and other personal information transmitted.
SECTION 3. Chapter 46-12.2 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Infrastructure
Bank" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-12.2-4.4. Funding for electric and hybrid motor vehicle fire safety program.
The Rhode Island infrastructure bank is authorized to assist in funding, from the clean
energy fund created pursuant to § 46-12.2-4.3, the efforts of the state fire marshal in carrying out
the objectives of the electrical fire safety program at § 31-3-130 and § 23-28.2-31.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC002614
========
LC002614 - Page 2 of 3